en: Homecare & Hospital Beds
xx: Homecare & Hospital Beds
cs: Nemocniční lůžka
da: Hjemmepleje og hospitalssenge
de: Krankenhaus- und Pflegebetten
es: Camas para hospitales y asistencia en el hogar
fr: Lits médicalisés, lit médicalisé
it: Letti per assistenza domiciliare e ospedaliera
ja: 介護ベッド
nl: Thuiszorg en ziekenhuisbedden
no: Senger for sykehus og hjemmepleie
pl: Łóżka do opieki domowej i szpitalnej
pt: Camas para hospital e tratamento em casa
ru: Больничные койки
sv: Sängar för sjukhus och hemvård
tr: Evde Bakım ve Hastane Yatakları

en: Medical Cabinets
xx: Medical Cabinets
cs: Instrumentační skříňky
da: Medicinskabe
de: Medikamentenaufbewahrung
es: Armarios médicos
fr: Armoires médicales
it: Mobiletti dei medicinali
ja: 医療用キャビネット
nl: Medicijnkasten
no: Medisinske skap
pl: Szafy medyczne
pt: Armarinhos
ru: Медицинские шкафы
sv: Sjukhusskåp
tr: Tıbbi Malzeme Dolapları

en: Medical Carts
xx: Medical Carts
cs: Lékařské vozíky
da: Medicinvogne
de: Medizinische Wagen
es: Carros médicos
fr: Chariots médicaux
it: Carrelli distribuzione farmaci
ja: 医療用ワゴン
nl: Medicijnkarren
no: Medisinske vogner
pl: Wózki medyczne
pt: Carrinhos médicos
ru: Медицинские тележки
sv: Sjukhusvagnar
tr: Medikal Arabalar

en: Crash Carts
xx: Crash Carts
cs: Vozíky na léky
da: Hjertestopvogne
de: Reanimationswagen
es: Carros de emergencias
fr: Chariots d'urgence
it: Carrelli di emergenza
ja: 救急ワゴン
nl: Reanimatiekarren
no: Akuttvogner
pl: Wózki reanimacyjne
pt: Carrinhos de emergência
ru: Реанимационные тележки
sv: Akutvagnar
tr: Acil Müdahale Arabaları

en: IV Poles & Carts
xx: IV Poles & Carts
cs: Infuzní stojany a vozíky
da: Dropstativer og vogne
de: Infusionsständer & -wagen
es: Carros y portasueros
fr: Pieds à perfusion
it: Aste e carrelli portaflebo
ja: IVポール・ワゴン
nl: Infuuspalen en -karren
no: Infusjonsstativer og vogner
pl: Stojaki na kroplówki i wózki
pt: Porta-soros e carrinhos
ru: Штативы и тележки для внутривенных инъекций
sv: Droppställningar och droppvagnar
tr: Serum Askı ve Arabaları

en: Surgical Tables
xx: Surgical Tables
cs: Operační stoly
da: Operationsborde
de: OP-Tische
es: Mesas quirúrgicas
fr: Tables chirurgicales
it: Tavoli chirurgici
ja: 手術台
nl: Operatietafels
no: Operasjonsbord
pl: Stoły chirurgiczne
pt: Mesas cirúrgicas
ru: Операционные столы
sv: Operationsbord
tr: Ameliyat Masaları

en: Medical Instruments
xx: Medical Instruments
cs: Lékařské nástroje
da: Medicinske instrumenter
de: Medizinische Instrumente
es: Instrumentos médicos
fr: Instruments médicaux
it: Strumenti medici
ja: 医療用器具
nl: Medische instrumenten
no: Medisinske instrumenter
pl: Instrumenty medyczne
pt: Instrumentos médicos
ru: Медицинские инструменты
sv: Medicinska instrument
tr: Tıbbi Aletler

en: Medical Forceps
xx: Medical Forceps
cs: Lékařské kleště
da: Medicinske pincetter
de: Medizinische Zangen
es: Fórceps médicos
fr: Forceps
it: Forcipi medici
ja: 鉗子
nl: Medische tang
no: Medisinske pinsetter/tenger
pl: Kleszcze medyczne
pt: Fórceps
ru: Медицинские щипцы
sv: Medicinsk tång
tr: Medikal Forsepsler

en: Scalpel Blades
xx: Scalpel Blades
cs: Skalpelové čepelky
da: Skalpelblade
de: Skalpellklingen
es: Cuchillas de bisturí
fr: Lames de scalpels
it: Lame per scalpelli
ja: メス替刃
nl: Scalpelbladen
no: Skalpellblader
pl: Ostrza do skalpeli
pt: Lâminas de bisturi
ru: Лезвия для скальпелей
sv: Skalpellblad
tr: Neşter Bıçakları

en: Scalpels
xx: Scalpels
cs: Skalpely
da: Skalpeller
de: Skalpelle
es: Bisturís
fr: Scalpels
it: Scalpelli
ja: メス
nl: Scalpels
no: Skalpeller
pl: Skalpele
pt: Bisturis
ru: Скальпели
sv: Skalpeller
tr: Neşterler

en: Surgical Needles & Sutures
xx: Surgical Needles & Sutures
cs: Chirurgické jehly a nitě
da: Operationsnåle og suturer
de: Chirurgische Nadeln und Fäden
es: Suturas y agujas quirúrgicas
fr: Aiguilles chirurgicales et sutures
it: Aghi e suture chirurgici
ja: 手術用縫合針、手術用縫合糸
nl: Chirurgische naalden en hechtdraad
no: Kirurgiske nåler og suturer
pl: Igły i nici chirurgiczne
pt: Agulhas e suturas cirúrgicas
ru: Ххирургические иглы и нити
sv: Sprutor och suturer vid kirurgi
tr: Cerrahi İğneler ve İplikler

en: Medical Supplies
xx: Medical Supplies
cs: Zdravotnické potřeby
da: Medicinsk tilbehør
de: Medizinischer Bedarf
es: Material médico
fr: Matériel médical
it: Prodotti medici
ja: 医療用品
nl: Medische benodigdheden
no: Medisinsk forbruksmateriell
pl: Medyczne materiały eksploatacyjne
pt: Suprimentos médicos
ru: Медицинские расходные материалы
sv: Medicinska förbrukningsartiklar
tr: Medikal Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Catheters
xx: Catheters
fr: Cathéters, Cathéter

en: Disposable Gloves
xx: Disposable Gloves
cs: Jednorázové rukavice
da: Engangshandsker
de: Einweghandschuhe
es: Guantes desechables
fr: Gants jetables
it: Guanti monouso
ja: 使い捨て手袋
nl: Wegwerphandschoenen
no: Engangshansker
pl: Rękawiczki jednorazowe
pt: Luvas descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые перчатки
sv: Engångshandskar
tr: Tıbbi Eldivenler

en: Finger Cots
xx: Finger Cots
cs: Gumové návleky na prsty
da: Fingerskånere
de: Fingerlinge
es: Dediles
fr: Doigtiers
it: Ditali igienici
ja: 指サック
nl: Vingercondooms
no: Fingersmokker
pl: Osłonki na palce
pt: Protetores de dedo
ru: Медицинские напальчники
sv: Fingerskydd
tr: Parmak Koruyucular

en: Medical Needles & Syringes
xx: Medical Needles & Syringes
cs: Zdravotnické jehly a stříkačky
da: Nåle og sprøjter
de: Nadeln & Spritzen
es: Agujas y jeringas médicas
fr: Aiguilles et seringues médicales
it: Aghi e siringhe
ja: 注射器・注射針
nl: Naalden en injectiespuiten
no: Medisinske nåler og sprøyter
pl: Igły i strzykawki medyczne
pt: Seringas e agulhas médicas
ru: Медицинские иглы и шприцы
sv: Medicinska nålar och sprutor
tr: Tıbbi İğneler ve Şırıngalar

en: Medical Needle & Syringe Sets
xx: Medical Needle & Syringe Sets
cs: Sady injekčních jehel a stříkaček
da: Sæt med nåle og sprøjter
de: Sets aus Nadeln & Spritzen
es: Juegos de agujas y jeringas médicas
fr: Kits d'aiguilles et de seringues médicales
it: Set di aghi e siringhe
ja: 注射針・注射器セット
nl: Sets van medische naalden en injectiespuiten
no: Medisinske sprøyte- og kanylesett
pl: Zestawy igieł i strzykawek lekarskich
pt: Conjuntos de agulhas e seringas
ru: Шприцы в комплекте с иглами
sv: Set med kanyler och sprutor
tr: Medikal İğne ve Şırınga Setleri

en: Medical Needles
xx: Medical Needles
cs: Injekční jehly
da: Nåle
de: Nadeln
es: Agujas médicas
fr: Aiguilles médicales, Aiguille médicale
it: Aghi
ja: 注射針
nl: Medische naalden
no: Kanyler for medisinsk bruk
pl: Igły lekarskie
pt: Agulhas
ru: Иглы медицинские
sv: Kanyler
tr: Medikal İğneler

en: Medical Syringes
xx: Medical Syringes
cs: Injekční stříkačky
da: Sprøjter
de: Spritzen
es: Jeringas médicas
fr: Seringues médicales
it: Siringhe
ja: 注射器
nl: Medische injectiespuiten
no: Sprøyter for medisinsk bruk
pl: Strzykawki lekarskie
pt: Seringas
ru: Шприцы медицинские
sv: Injektionssprutor
tr: Medikal Şırıngalar

en: Ostomy Supplies
xx: Ostomy Supplies
cs: Stomické pomůcky
da: Stomihjælpemidler
de: Stomazubehör
es: Accesorios para ostomía
fr: Fournitures pour stomies
it: Materiali per stomia
ja: ストーマ関連用品
nl: Stomabenodigdheden
no: Stomiutstyr
pl: Produkty stomijne
pt: Acessórios para colostomia
ru: Средства для ухода за стомой
sv: Stomiartiklar
tr: Ostomi Sarf Malzemeleri